Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2256
Long-term care facility; notice required; form.

Every long-term care facility shall post in a conspicuous location a notice of the name, address, and telephone number of the office and the name and telephone number of the nearest local long-term care ombudsman program. A brief description of the services provided by the office and the nearest long-term care ombudsman program shall be included in the notice. The form of the notice shall be approved by the office.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 20.